Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.050

Activated county noxious weed control board—Members—Election—Terms—Meetings—Quorum—Expenses—Officers—Vacancy.

(1) Each activated county noxious weed control board consists of five voting members appointed by the county legislative authority in the manner prescribed in this section. In appointing the voting members, the county legislative authority shall divide the county into five geographical areas that best represent the county's interests, and appoint a voting member from each geographical area. At least three of the voting members shall be engaged in the primary production of agricultural products. There is one nonvoting member on the board who is the director of the county extension office or an extension agent appointed by the director of the county extension office. Each voting member of the board serves a term of four years, except that the county legislative authority shall, when a board is first activated under this chapter, designate two voting members to serve terms of two years. The board members shall not receive a salary but shall be compensated for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

(2)(a) The voting members of the board serve until their replacements are appointed. New members of the board shall be appointed at least thirty days prior to the expiration of any board member's term of office.

(b) Notice of expiration of a term of office shall be published at least twice in a weekly or daily newspaper of general circulation in the geographical area with last publication occurring at least ten days prior to the nomination. All persons interested in appointment to the board and residing in the geographical area with a pending nomination shall make a written application that includes the signatures of at least ten registered voters residing in the geographical area supporting the nomination to the county noxious weed control board. After nominations close, the county noxious weed control board shall, after a hearing, send the applications to the county legislative authority recommending the names of the most qualified candidates, and post the names of those nominees in the county courthouse or county website and publish in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county. The county legislative authority, within 60 days of receiving the list of nominees, shall appoint one of those nominees to the county noxious weed control board to represent that geographical area during that term of office. If the county legislative authority fails to appoint a nominee within the 60-day period and a quorum of the board is not seated, the county noxious weed control board shall appoint a nominee only to meet a quorum, who shall serve in that capacity until the county legislative authority appoints a nominee to fill the vacant position in the manner prescribed in this section. Not more than three board members may be appointed in this manner.

(3) Within thirty days after all the members have been appointed, the board shall conduct its first meeting. A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business and is necessary for any action taken by the board. The board shall elect from its members a chair and other officers as may be necessary.

(4) In case of a vacancy, the position must be filled in the manner prescribed in this section.

[ 2021 c 217 s 3; 1997 c 353 s 6; 1987 c 438 s 4; 1980 c 95 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 26 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 143 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 5.]